browser/locales/l10n/da/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/da.dic
abekat/70,133,976,449,947
adverbiel/841,70,366
afskrækkelsesmiddel/815,70,944,828
aksel/815,822,70,944,941,947
ansigtsmuskel/815,822,70,944
antikonceptionsmiddel/815,70,944,828
armmuskel/815,822,70,944
bagageregel/815,822,70,944
bankansat/841,70,366
barnecykel/815,822,70,944
batchkørsel/815,822,70,944
bedøvelsesmiddel/815,70,944,828
bekæmpelsesmiddel/815,70,944,828
bengel/815,822,70,944
beskyttelsesmiddel/815,70,944,828
betelnød/46,70,976,941,449,947
bevismiddel/815,70,944,828
bindemiddel/815,70,944,828
bintjekartoffel/815,822,70,944
biobrændsel/815,70,944,828
blegemiddel/815,70,944,828
blomst/70,73,7,976,437,947
blot/841,70,366
blødgøringsmiddel/815,70,944,828
bogaktuel/841,70,366
boligmangel/822,70
bortførsel/815,822,70,944
bosat/841,70,366
bryggekedel/815,822,70,944
brystmuskel/815,822,70,944
brændsel/815,70,944,828,939,947
buddhisttempel/815,70,944,828
bugmuskel/815,822,70,944
buskørsel/815,822,70,944
børnecykel/815,822,70,944
børnemøbel/815,70,944,828
cashewnød/46,70,976,941,449,947
cirkel/815,822,70,944,941,947
damecykel/815,822,70,944
datoveksel/815,822,70,944
definit/841,70,366
denatureringsmiddel/815,70,944,828
desinficeringsmiddel/815,70,944,828
dessertgaffel/815,822,70,944
disciplinærmiddel/815,70,944,828
driftsmiddel/815,70,944,828
drøm/70,133,976,449,947
dunlet/841,70,366
dødfødsel/815,822,70,944
dødtræt/841,70,366
dørhængsel/815,70,944,828
edderkop/46,70,976,449,947
egetræsmøbel/815,70,944,828
eksplicit/841,70,366
elefantsnabel/815,822,70,944
elkabel/815,70,944,828,941,947
engel/822,70
evigtgrøn/841,70,366
excenteraksel/815,822,70,944
falafel/815,822,70,944
fedttæt/841,70,366
firsårig/841,70,366
fiskeyngel/822,70
flerdimensionel/841,70,366
fletmøbel/815,70,944,828
floskel/815,822,70,944
fnuglet/841,70,366
foraksel/815,822,70,944
fortyndingsmiddel/815,70,944,828
forvarsel/815,822,70,944
frakørsel/815,822,70,944,939,947
fugttæt/841,70,366
fyreseddel/815,822,70,944
fængsel/815,70,944,828,939,947
færdigoversat/841,70,366
følgeseddel/815,822,70,944
gaskedel/815,822,70,944
gedebuk/70,133,976,449,947
giffel/815,822,70,944
gigtmiddel/815,70,944,828
grib/70,133,976,449,947
grundregel/815,822,70,944
gæk/70,133,976,449,947
gødningsmiddel/815,70,944,828
habituel/841,70,366
halsmuskel/815,822,70,944
halvtredskroneseddel/815,822,70,944
hasselnød/46,70,976,941,449,947
havemøbel/815,70,944,828
helmat/841,70,366
hjemførsel/815,822,70,944
hjertemuskel/815,822,70,944
honnet/841,70,366
hulstrimmel/815,822,70,944
huskeregel/815,822,70,944
hæk/70,133,976,941,449,947
hærdemiddel/815,70,944,828
hævemiddel/815,70,944,828
højrekørsel/815,822,70,944
håndstempel/815,70,944,828
ikkekommerciel/841,70,366
ilttilførsel/815,822,70,944
indefinit/841,70,366
indgangsvinkel/815,822,70,944
indlæggelsesseddel/815,822,70,944
infrastrukturel/841,70,366
insektmiddel/815,70,944,828
isglat/841,70,366
jesuit/46,70,976,437,947
jomfrufødsel/815,822,70,944
jordkabel/815,70,944,828
jordnød/46,70,976,941,449,947
kampmiddel/815,70,944,828
kanonflot/841,70,366
kapitaltilførsel/815,822,70,944
kapsel/815,822,70,944
kat/70,133,976,449,947
kernebrændsel/815,70,944,828
kildeskat/737,70,976,449,947
kjortel/815,822,70,944
klæbemiddel/815,70,944,828
klæbestrimmel/815,822,70,944
kogekedel/815,822,70,944
kok/70,133,976,449,947
kontormøbel/815,70,944,828
kontraktansat/841,70,366
kraftoverførsel/815,822,70,944
krakmandel/815,822,70,944
kunstmiddel/815,70,944,828
kvindefængsel/815,70,944,828
kølemiddel/815,70,944,828
ladcykel/815,822,70,944
lam/70,254,976,449,947
lap/46,70,976,941,449,947
limegrøn/841,70,366
limousinekørsel/815,822,70,944,939,947
lufttilførsel/815,822,70,944
lydret/841,70,366
lyslederkabel/815,70,944,828
lystæt/841,70,366
længsel/815,822,70,944,939,947
løn/70,133,976,449,947
løstansat/841,70,366
lårmuskel/815,822,70,944
madtempel/815,70,944,828
mat/841,70,366
medaljeskammel/815,822,70,944
middel/815,70,944,828,941,947
miljøtrussel/815,822,70,944
mis/46,70,976,449,947
modsat/841,70,366
motionscykel/815,822,70,944
mundret/841,70,366
møbel/815,70,944,828,941,947
naturlægemiddel/815,70,944,828
navneseddel/815,822,70,944
nervemiddel/815,70,944,828
notariel/841,70,366
nød/46,70,976,449,947
opsat/841,70,366
opsigelsesvarsel/815,70,944,828
ordensregel/815,822,70,944
ordreseddel/815,822,70,944
ormemiddel/815,70,944,828,941,947
overenskomstansat/841,70,366
overmæt/841,70,366
paddehat/70,133,976,941,449,947
pakkeseddel/815,822,70,944
paranød/46,70,976,941,449,947
pebernød/46,70,976,941,449,947
pen/70,133,976,449,947
pendel/815,822,70,944
pengeoverførsel/815,822,70,944
perlebesat/841,70,366
pistacienød/46,70,976,941,449,947
pletfjerningsmiddel/815,70,944,828
polarcirkel/815,822,70,944
polermiddel/815,70,944,828
poststempel/815,70,944,828
privatansat/841,70,366
propmæt/841,70,366
præpositionel/841,70,366
præventionsmiddel/815,70,944,828
påkørsel/815,822,70,944,939,947
pålægsgaffel/815,822,70,944
referentiel/841,70,366
regntæt/841,70,366
rengøringsmiddel/815,70,944,828
resolut/841,70,366
retsregel/815,822,70,944
rok/70,133,976,449,947
rumkapsel/815,822,70,944
rygmuskel/815,822,70,944
rødviolet/841,70,366
sadel/815,822,70,944,941,947
samarit/46,70,976,437,947
sat/841,70,366
seddel/815,822,70,944,941,947
siddemøbel/815,70,944,828
sigtveksel/815,822,70,944
silkeglat/841,70,366
situationel/841,70,366
skat/46,70,976,449,947
skat/70,133,976,449,947
skræmmemiddel/815,70,944,828
skudrigel/815,822,70,944
skudvinkel/815,822,70,944
skønhedsmiddel/815,70,944,828,941,947
smigvinkel/815,822,70,944
smørrebrødsseddel/815,822,70,944
sneglat/841,70,366
sofacykel/815,822,70,944
sok/46,70,976,449,947
soldat/70,73,7,976,437,947
sovemiddel/815,70,944,828
spejlglat/841,70,366
spirituskørsel/815,822,70,944
stakkel/815,822,70,944
startkabel/815,70,944,828
stedsegrøn/841,70,366
stempel/815,70,944,828,941,947
stivelsesmiddel/815,70,944,828
strimmel/815,822,70,944
stråforkortningsmiddel/815,70,944,828
student/70,73,7,976,437,947
stålsat/841,70,366
sugesnabel/815,822,70,944
svikkel/815,822,70,944
syndebuk/70,133,976,449,947
særregel/815,822,70,944
særstempel/815,70,944,828
søkabel/815,70,944,828
søn/46,70,976,449,947
telefonkabel/815,70,944,828
territoriel/841,70,366
tidskapsel/815,822,70,944
tidskørsel/815,822,70,944
trafikmiddel/815,70,944,828
triangel/815,822,70,944
tromletyk/841,70,366
trommehvirvel/815,822,70,944
tændkabel/815,70,944,828
tændrørskabel/815,70,944,828
ubesat/841,70,366
udfaldsvinkel/815,822,70,944
ultralet/841,70,366
undervisningsmiddel/815,70,944,828
universalrengøringsmiddel/815,70,944,828
urovarsel/815,70,944,828
usammensat/841,70,366
valnød/46,70,976,941,449,947
vantrivsel/822,70
vaskemiddel/815,70,944,828
vehikel/815,70,944,828
vektoriel/841,70,366
ven/46,70,976,449,947
violet/841,70,366
virkemiddel/815,70,944,828
værnemiddel/815,70,944,828
ægvinkel/815,822,70,944
ætsemiddel/815,70,944,828
